Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2196.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 75-7c20 is hereby amended to read as follows: 75-
7c20. (a) The carrying of a concealed handgun shall not be prohibited in
any public area of any state or municipal building unless such public area
has adequate security measures to ensure that no weapons are permitted to
be carried into such public area and the public area is conspicuously
posted with either permanent or temporary signage approved by the
governing body, or the chief administrative officer, if no governing body
exists, in accordance with K.S.A. 75-7c10, and amendments thereto.
(b) The carrying of a concealed handgun shall not be prohibited
throughout any state or municipal building in its entirety unless such
building has adequate security measures at all public access entrances to
ensure that no weapons are permitted to be carried into such building and
the building is conspicuously posted in accordance with K.S.A. 75-7c10,
and amendments thereto.
(c) No state agency or municipality shall prohibit an employee from
carrying a concealed handgun at the employee's work place unless the
building has adequate security measures at all public access entrances to
ensure that no weapons are permitted to be carried into such building and
the building is conspicuously posted in accordance with K.S.A. 75-7c10,
and amendments thereto.
(d) (1) It shall not be a violation of the personal and family protection
act for a person to carry a concealed handgun into a state or municipal
building, or any public area thereof, so long as that person has authority to
enter through a restricted access entrance into such building, or public area
thereof, that provides adequate security measures at all public access
entrances and the building, or public area thereof, is conspicuously posted
in accordance with K.S.A. 75-7c10, and amendments thereto.
(2) Any person, who is not an employee of the state or a municipality
and is not otherwise authorized to enter a state or municipal building
through a restricted access entrance, shall be authorized to enter through a

HB 2196 2
restricted access entrance, provided such person:
(A) Is authorized by the chief law enforcement officer, governing
body, or the chief administrative officer, if no governing body exists, to
enter such state or municipal building through a restricted access entrance;
(B) is issued an identification card by the chief law enforcement
officer, governing body, or the chief administrative officer, if no governing
body exists, which that includes such person's photograph, name and any
other identifying information deemed necessary by the issuing entity, and
which that states on the identification card that such person is authorized
to enter such building through a restricted access entrance; and
(C) executes an affidavit or other notarized statement that such person
acknowledges that certain firearms and weapons may be prohibited in such
building and that violating any such regulations may result in the
revocation of such person's authority to enter such building through a
restricted access entrance.
The chief law enforcement officer, governing body, or the chief
administrative officer, if no governing body exists, shall develop criteria
for approval of individuals subject to this paragraph to enter the state or
municipal building through a restricted access entrance. Such criteria may
include the requirement that the individual submit to a state and national
criminal history records check before issuance and renewal of such
authorization and pay a fee to cover the costs of such background checks.
An individual who has been issued a concealed carry permit by the state of
Kansas shall not be required to submit to another state and national
criminal records check before issuance and renewal of such authorization.
Notwithstanding any authorization granted under this paragraph, an
individual may be subjected to additional security screening measures
upon reasonable suspicion or in circumstances where heightened security
measures are warranted. Such authorization does not permit the individual
to carry a concealed weapon into a public building, which that has
adequate security measures, as defined by this act, and which that is
conspicuously posted in accordance with K.S.A. 75-7c10, and
amendments thereto.
(e) A state agency or municipality that provides adequate security
measures in a state or municipal building and which that conspicuously
posts signage in accordance with K.S.A. 75-7c10, and amendments
thereto, prohibiting the carrying of a concealed handgun in such building
shall not be liable for any wrongful act or omission relating to actions of
persons carrying a concealed handgun concerning acts or omissions
regarding such handguns.
(f) A state agency or municipality that does not provide adequate
security measures in a state or municipal building and that allows the
carrying of a concealed handgun shall not be liable for any wrongful act or

HB 2196 3
omission relating to actions of persons carrying a concealed handgun
concerning acts or omissions regarding such handguns.
(g) Nothing in this act shall limit the ability of a corrections facility, a
jail facility or a law enforcement agency to prohibit the carrying of a
handgun or other firearm concealed or unconcealed by any person into any
secure area of a building located on such premises, except those areas of
such building outside of a secure area and readily accessible to the public
shall be subject to the provisions of subsection (a).
(h) Nothing in this section shall limit the ability of the chief judge of
each judicial district to prohibit the carrying of a concealed handgun by
any person into courtrooms or ancillary courtrooms within the district
provided the public area has adequate security measures to ensure that no
weapons are permitted to be carried into such public area and the public
area is conspicuously posted in accordance with K.S.A. 75-7c10, and
amendments thereto.
(i) The governing body or the chief administrative officer, if no
governing body exists, of a state or municipal building, may exempt the
building, or any public area thereof, from this section until July 1, 2017, by
adopting a resolution, or drafting a letter, listing the legal description of
such building, listing the reasons for such exemption, and including the
following statement: "A security plan has been developed for the building
being exempted which supplies adequate security to the occupants of the
building and merits the prohibition of the carrying of a concealed
handgun." A copy of the security plan for the building shall be maintained
on file and shall be made available, upon request, to the Kansas attorney
general and the law enforcement agency of local jurisdiction. Notice of
this exemption, together with the resolution adopted or the letter drafted,
shall be sent to the Kansas attorney general and to the law enforcement
agency of local jurisdiction. The security plan shall not be subject to
disclosure under the Kansas open records act.
(j) The governing body or the chief administrative officer, if no
governing body exists, of any postsecondary educational institution, as
defined in K.S.A. 74-3201b, and amendments thereto, may exempt any
building of such institution, including any buildings located on the grounds
of such institution and any buildings leased by such institution, or any
public area thereof, from this section until July 1, 2017, by stating the
reasons for such exemption and sending notice of such exemption to the
Kansas attorney general.
(k) The provisions of this section shall not apply to:
(1) Any building located on the grounds of the Kansas state school
for the deaf or the Kansas state school for the blind;
(2) a state or municipal-owned medical care facility, as defined in
K.S.A. 65-425, and amendments thereto;

HB 2196 4
(3) a state or municipal-owned adult care home, as defined in K.S.A.
39-923, and amendments thereto;
(4) a community mental health center organized pursuant to K.S.A.
19-4001 et seq., and amendments thereto;
(5) an indigent health care clinic, as defined by K.S.A. 65-7402, and
amendments thereto; or
(6) any postsecondary educational institution, as defined in K.S.A.
74-3201b, and amendments thereto; or
(7) any building owned or leased by the authority created under the
university of Kansas hospital authority act, any building located within the
health care district, as defined in the unified government of Wyandotte
county and Kansas City, Kansas City-wide master plan, Rosedale master
plan and traffic study or similar master plan or comprehensive planning or
zoning document approved by the unified government of Wyandotte
county and Kansas City, Kansas in effect on January 12, 2017.
(l)(j) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any law
enforcement officer, as defined in K.S.A. 75-7c22, and amendments
thereto, who satisfies the requirements of either K.S.A. 75-7c22(a) or (b),
and amendments thereto, from carrying a concealed handgun into any state
or municipal building, or any public area thereof, in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-7c22, and amendments thereto, subject to any
restrictions or prohibitions imposed in any courtroom by the chief judge of
the judicial district.
(m)(k) For purposes of this section:
(1) "Adequate security measures" means the use of electronic
equipment and armed personnel at public entrances to detect and restrict
the carrying of any weapons into the state or municipal building, or any
public area thereof, including, but not limited to, metal detectors, metal
detector wands or any other equipment used for similar purposes to ensure
that weapons are not permitted to be carried into such building or public
area by members of the public. Adequate security measures for storing and
securing lawfully carried weapons, including, but not limited to, the use of
gun lockers or other similar storage options may be provided at public
entrances.
(2) "Authorized personnel" means employees of a state agency or
municipality and any person granted authorization pursuant to subsection
(d)(2), who are authorized to enter a state or municipal building through a
restricted access entrance.
(3) The terms "municipality" and "municipal" are interchangeable
and have the same meaning as the term "municipality" is defined in K.S.A.
75-6102, and amendments thereto, but does not include school districts.
(4) "Public area" means any portion of a state or municipal building
that is open to and accessible by the public or which that is otherwise

HB 2196 5
designated as a public area by the governing body or the chief
administrative officer, if no governing body exists, of such building.
(5) "Restricted access entrance" means an entrance that is restricted to
the public and requires a key, keycard, code, or similar device to allow
entry to authorized personnel.
(6) "State" means the same as the term is defined in K.S.A. 75-6102,
and amendments thereto.
(7) (A) "State or municipal building" means a building owned or
leased by such public entity. It does not include a building owned by the
state or a municipality which that is leased by a private entity whether for
profit or not-for-profit or a building held in title by the state or a
municipality solely for reasons of revenue bond financing.
(B) The term "state and municipal building" shall not include the
state capitol.
(8) "Weapon" means a weapon described in K.S.A. 2022 Supp. 21-
6301, and amendments thereto, except the term "weapon" shall not include
any cutting instrument that has a sharpened or pointed blade.
(n)(l) This section shall be a part of and supplemental to the personal
and family protection act.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 75-7c20 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the Kansas register.